Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.79.030 and 2023 c 123 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as a registered nurse in this state unless that human person has been licensed under this chapter or holds a valid multistate license under chapter 18.80 RCW. A person who holds a license to practice as a registered nurse in this state may use the titles "registered nurse" and "nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N." No other person or any nonhuman entity may assume those titles or use the abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person or any nonhuman entity using them is a registered nurse.(2) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as an advanced registered nurse practitioner or as a nurse practitioner in this state unless that human person has been licensed under this chapter. A person who holds a license to practice as an advanced registered nurse practitioner in this state may use the titles "advanced registered nurse practitioner," "nurse practitioner," and "nurse" and the abbreviations "A.R.N.P." and "N.P." No other person or any nonhuman entity may assume those titles or use those abbreviations or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person or any nonhuman entity using them is an advanced registered nurse practitioner or nurse practitioner.(3) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state unless that human person has been licensed under this chapter or holds a valid multistate license under chapter 18.80 RCW. A person who holds a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state may use the titles "licensed practical nurse" and "nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N." No other person or any nonhuman entity may assume those titles or use that abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person or any nonhuman entity using them is a licensed practical nurse.(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person listed as a Christian Science nurse in the Christian Science Journal published by the Christian Science Publishing Society, Boston, Massachusetts, from using the title "Christian Science nurse," so long as such person does not hold himself or herself out as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse, unless otherwise authorized by law to do so.Sec. 2. RCW 18.79.030 and 2024 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as a registered nurse in this state unless that human person has been licensed under this chapter or holds a valid multistate license under chapter 18.80 RCW. A person who holds a license to practice as a registered nurse in this state may use the titles "registered nurse" and "nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N." No other person or any nonhuman entity may assume those titles or use the abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person or any nonhuman entity using them is a registered nurse.(2) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse or as a nurse practitioner in this state unless that human person has been licensed under this chapter. A person who holds a license to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse in this state may use the titles "advanced practice registered nurse," "nurse practitioner," and "nurse" and the abbreviations "A.P.R.N." and "N.P." No other person or any nonhuman entity may assume those titles or use those abbreviations or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person or any nonhuman entity using them is an advanced practice registered nurse or nurse practitioner.(3) It is unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state unless that human person has been licensed under this chapter or holds a valid multistate license under chapter 18.80 RCW. A person who holds a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state may use the titles "licensed practical nurse" and "nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N." No other person or any nonhuman entity may assume those titles or use that abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or figures to indicate that the person or any nonhuman entity using them is a licensed practical nurse.(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person listed as a Christian Science nurse in the Christian Science Journal published by the Christian Science Publishing Society, Boston, Massachusetts, from using the title "Christian Science nurse," so long as such person does not hold himself or herself out as a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse, unless otherwise authorized by law to do so.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30, 2027.--- END ---